Utah statutes.
63B-2-103.   Use of bond proceeds for issuance and other costs.

The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter shall be used for the purposes described in Section 63B-2-102 and to pay all or part of any cost incident to the issuance and sale of the bonds including, without limitation, printing, registration and transfer costs, legal fees, trustees' fees, financial advisors' fees, and underwriters' discount.

